Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Investigations Ordered by Superior Judge or Attorney General

§ 5161.
Investigation of crime by experts.

To prevent a failure of Justice, a Superior Judge or the Attorney General may order an examination to be made by an expert or experts, either within or without the State, in the investigation of a crime supposed to have been committed within the State.
Such order shall be made only on the petition of the State’s Attorney for the county in which the crime is supposed to have been committed, setting forth the facts because of which the order is applied for, and verified by affidavit, and shall name the expert or experts by whom the examination is to be made, and limit the expense of the examination.
Such expense shall be paid in the manner provided for the payment of witness fees in State causes in the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 5162.
Autopsy.

Upon the petition of the State’s Attorney, a Superior Judge or the Attorney General may order an autopsy or exhumation and autopsy to be performed by the chief medical examiner or under his or her direction in the preparation of a State cause for trial in any court, or in the interest of public health, welfare, or safety or in the furtherance of the administration of the law.
Upon completion of the autopsy, the chief medical examiner shall submit a report to the State’s Attorney and shall complete and sign a certificate of death.

HISTORY:

Amended 1969, No. 265 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 1971, No. 33, § 1.